Tennessee, session 114, HB0050.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Chapter 90 of the Private Acts of 1991, as amended by Chapter 207 of the
Private Acts of 1992, and Chapter 1 of the Private Acts of 2009, and any other acts amendatory
thereto, is amended by deleting the following in Section 2.01 in Article II:
On the first Tuesday in June, 1993, an election shall be conducted by the county
election commissioners, at the same hours and places for holding general
elections and under the general election laws of Tennessee, to elect a mayor and
three (3) aldermen for a term of four (4) years, from the city at large.
and substituting instead:
On the first Tuesday in June 2025, an election shall be conducted by the county
election commissioners, at the same hour and places for holding general
elections and under the general election laws of Tennessee, to elect a mayor and
five (5) aldermen for a term of four (4) years, from the city at large.
SECTION 2. Chapter 90 of the Private Acts of 1991, as amended by Chapter 54 of the
Private Acts of 2022, and any other acts amendatory thereto, is amended by deleting the
following in Section 2.02 in Article II:
The Mayor and three (3) Aldermen shall compose the Board of Mayor and
Alderman, in which is vested all corporate and other legislative powers of the
City, except as otherwise provided in this act.
and substituting instead:
HB0050
000286
- 1 -

The mayor and five (5) aldermen shall compose the board of mayor and
aldermen, in which is vested all corporate, legislative and other powers of the
city, except as otherwise provided in this act.
SECTION 3. Chapter 90 of the Private Acts of 1991, and any acts amendatory thereto,
is amended by deleting the following in Section 2.08 in Article II:
The affirmative vote of at least two (2) members of the board shall be required to
pass any motion, resolution or ordinance.
and substituting instead:
The affirmative vote of a majority of the board shall be required to pass any
motion, resolution or ordinance.
SECTION 4. This act shall have no effect unless it is approved by a two-thirds (2/3) vote
of the legislative body of the City of Celina. Its approval or nonapproval shall be proclaimed by
the presiding officer the legislative body and certified to the secretary of state.
SECTION 5. For the purpose of approving or rejecting the provisions of this act, it shall
be effective upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it. For all other purposes, it shall
become effective as provided in Section 4.
- 2 - 000286